Mississippi, session 2026, HB1100.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  The following shall be codified as Section 37-11-89, Mississippi Code of 1972: 37-11-89.  This act shall be known and may be cited as the "Mississippi Teachers' Bill of Rights." SECTION 2.  The following shall be codified as Section 37-11-91, Mississippi Code of 1972: 37-11-91.  As used in Sections 37-11-89, et seq., the following terms shall have the meanings ascribed in this section, unless context of use requires otherwise: (a) "Classroom" means any instructional setting under the direct supervision of a teacher, including a laboratory, gymnasium, media center, cafeteria during assigned supervision, school bus during assigned supervision, or any other school-sponsored setting in which a teacher is responsible for student supervision and instruction. (b) "Teacher" means any person employed by a public school district or public charter school in Mississippi who is assigned primary responsibility for instruction or supervision of students and who holds a valid educator license issued by the Mississippi Department of Education, including a classroom teacher, special education teacher, vocational teacher and any other licensed instructional personnel. (c)  "Disruptive conduct" means student behavior that, in the professional judgment of the teacher, substantially and materially interferes with instruction, learning or orderly operation of the classroom, or interferes with another student's right to learn, after the teacher has provided directions and reasonable opportunities to comply.  The term includes, but is not limited to: (i)  Persistent refusal to comply with lawful directions; (ii)  Sustained verbal outbursts; (iii)  Profane, abusive or harassing language directed at any person; (iv)  Deliberate interruption of instruction; (v)  Intimidation or bullying occurring within the classroom setting; (vi)  Unauthorized use of electronic devices to disrupt instruction; and (vii)  Any conduct that incites or is likely to incite other students to disrupt instruction. (d)  "Threatening conduct" means conduct that a reasonable teacher would interpret as a credible threat of physical harm, intimidation, bullying, harassment or retaliation against a teacher, another school employee or a student, whether verbal, written, electronic or physical. (e) "Removal" means the teacher-directed exclusion of a student from the classroom pursuant to Section 37-11-95, with immediate placement under administrative control. (f) "Administrative placement" means assignment of a removed student to a supervised setting designated by the principal or designee that is not the teacher's classroom from which the student was removed. (g) "Readmission" means the return of a removed student to the teacher's classroom pursuant to Section 37-11-97. (h)  "Classroom management plan" means a written plan developed by a teacher and approved pursuant to Section 37-11-93 that establishes classroom rules, progressive interventions, grounds for removal and documentation procedures. (i)  "School day" means a day on which students are required to be present for instruction. (j)  "Student with a disability" has the meaning provided in Section 37-11-57(3). SECTION 3.  The following shall be codified as Section 37-11-93, Mississippi Code of 1972: 37-11-93.  (1)  Each teacher shall develop a classroom management plan for each course or instructional setting for each school year.  The plan must be consistent with the local school board's code of student conduct and the policies adopted under Section 37-11-55. (2)  Each principal shall establish, in writing, the process and timeline for submission and approval of classroom management plans.  A plan shall be approved or returned for revision within ten (10) school days after submission.  If a plan is returned for revision, the principal shall state the specific reason for the revision requirement and the teacher may resubmit a revised plan within five (5) school days. (3)  A classroom management plan is deemed approved if the principal does not approve or return the plan for revision within the ten (10) school day period provided in subsection (2). (4)  At the beginning of each school year and within ten (10) school days after a student enrolls, each school shall provide to the student's parent or legal guardian a copy of, or electronic access to, the school's code of student conduct and a notice that each teacher maintains a classroom management plan and may remove a student from the classroom under Sections 37-11-95 through 37-11-99. (5)  Nothing in this section limits a teacher from taking immediate, reasonable action necessary to protect students or staff, or to maintain control and discipline, as otherwise authorized by law. SECTION 4.  The following shall be codified as Section 37-11-95, Mississippi Code of 1972: 37-11-95.  (1)  The teacher is the primary authority in classroom matters.  Subject to state and federal law, and consistent with the approved classroom management plan and the local code of student conduct, a teacher has the right and duty to direct instruction, establish and enforce classroom rules and maintain an orderly learning environment. (2)  A teacher may order the immediate removal of a student from the classroom when, in the professional judgment of the teacher, the student: (a)  Engages in disruptive conduct; (b)  Obstructs the teaching or learning process of other students; (c)  Uses threatening conduct toward a teacher, school employee, or student; (d)  Intentionally damages school property or the property of another person within the classroom; (e)  Engages in fighting, physical aggression, or any act that creates a reasonable fear of imminent physical harm; (f)  Possesses or uses an object in a manner that is dangerous or is reasonably perceived as a weapon, whether or not the object is a weapon under other law; or (g)  Willfully refuses to comply with lawful directions after the teacher has provided appropriate warnings and interventions consistent with the classroom management plan. (3)  Upon removal under subsection (2), the teacher shall direct the student to the principal's office or other designated supervised setting.  The principal or designee shall immediately assume control and supervision of the student and shall provide administrative placement for the remainder of that class period and for such additional time as is authorized by the code of student conduct, this article and other applicable law. (4)  A teacher is not required to continue instruction while a removed student remains in the classroom.  A principal or designee shall ensure the student is removed promptly and safely. (5)  A principal may not deny a teacher's removal under this section.  If the principal believes the removal was not consistent with the code of student conduct, the principal may initiate the appeal process under Section 37-11-92, but the student shall remain in administrative placement until readmission requirements under Section 37-11-91 are satisfied, unless the teacher consents to earlier return. (6)  A removal under this section is not a suspension or expulsion.  Suspension or expulsion may be imposed only by the superintendent, principal, or school board in accordance with law. SECTION 5.  The following shall be codified as Section 37-11-97, Mississippi Code of 1972: 37-11-97.  (1) Within one (1) school day after a removal under Section 37-11-95, the teacher shall complete a written incident report describing the conduct that led to removal, the interventions attempted if applicable, and any immediate safety concerns.  The principal shall provide a simple, standardized form for this purpose and shall ensure that completion of the report does not require a teacher to forfeit instructional time. (2)  Within one (1) school day after the removal, the principal or designee shall notify the parent or legal guardian of the removal and the reason for removal.  The notice may be made by telephone, electronic communication or written notice, but must be documented. (3)  A removed student may not be returned to the teacher's classroom until the principal provides the teacher a written certification that identifies the administrative action taken.  The certification must include, at a minimum: (a)  The disciplinary response or intervention applied; (b)  Any safety plan or behavior supports implemented; and (c)  The conditions for continued classroom participation. (4)  If a student is removed from the same teacher's classroom two (2) times during a semester, the student may not be readmitted to that teacher's classroom until a conference is conducted.  The conference shall include the teacher and the principal and, when feasible, the parent or legal guardian.  The conference must occur within five (5) school days after the second removal.  If the parent or legal guardian is unavailable despite documented good-faith efforts, the conference may proceed without the parent or legal guardian, and the principal shall offer an additional conference opportunity within ten (10) school days. (5)  Following the conference under subsection (4), the principal shall ensure that a written behavioral support plan is developed and implemented.  The plan must state the specific behavior expectations, supports, consequences for further disruptions and any services or referrals that will be provided. (6)  Nothing in this section prohibits the teacher from consenting to earlier readmission when the teacher determines that safety and order can be maintained; however, the written certification required under subsection (3) must still be provided. (7)  For a student with a disability, documentation, notice, administrative placement and readmission under this section shall be implemented in a manner consistent with the Individuals with Disabilities Education Act, Section 504 of the Rehabilitation Act of 1973 and their implementing regulations, including requirements concerning manifestation determinations, procedural safeguards and changes of placement. SECTION 6.  The following shall be codified as Section 37-11-99, Mississippi Code of 1972: 37-11-99.  (1)  If a student is removed from the same teacher's classroom three (3) times within any thirty (30) school day period, the principal shall, within two (2) school days after the third removal, take one or more of the following actions consistent with the code of student conduct: (a)  Impose in-school suspension; (b)  Impose out-of-school suspension in accordance with law; (c)  Recommend or assign the student to an alternative school or alternative educational program, if available and permitted by law; or (d)  Initiate other maximum disciplinary action available for the student's conduct under local policy, including a safety or risk assessment and referral to appropriate services. (2)  Each local school board and each public charter school governing board shall adopt a written process that allows a teacher to appeal to the superintendent or the superintendent's designee when: (a)  The teacher asserts that a student was returned to the teacher's classroom without compliance with Section 37-11-91; or (b)  The teacher asserts that the principal failed to take escalating action required by subsection (1). (3)  The appeal process must provide, at a minimum: (a)  A method for the teacher to submit a written appeal; (b)  A determination within five (5) school days after receipt of the appeal; (c)  A written decision stating the basis for the determination; and (d)  A requirement that the student remain out of the teacher's classroom pending the appeal decision unless the teacher consents. (4)  A school district, public charter school, local school board, governing board, administrator or employee may not discipline, intimidate, threaten, coerce or otherwise retaliate against a teacher for exercising rights or performing duties under Sections 37-11-89 through 37-11-103 in good faith.  A teacher may file a written complaint with the superintendent, and the school district or charter school shall ensure a prompt investigation and written resolution.  Nothing in this subsection limits remedies otherwise available under state or federal law. (5)  Nothing in this section shall be construed to limit the authority of the superintendent, principal or school board to impose discipline under other law, or to limit the authority of a teacher to maintain control and discipline under Section 37-11-57. SECTION 7.  The following shall be codified as Section 37-11-101, Mississippi Code of 1972: 37-11-101.  (1)  In addition to the protections provided in Section 37-11-57, a teacher or other school employee who, in good faith, acts or omits to act in compliance with Sections 37-11-89 through 37-11-103 and the local school district's adopted code of student conduct is presumed to have acted within the course and scope of employment. (2)  A teacher or other school employee acting within the course and scope of employment and in compliance with Sections 37-11-89 through 37-11-103 shall not be subject to civil or criminal liability for a removal, administrative placement decision or readmission decision, except in the case of excessive force or cruel and unusual punishment, acts outside the course and scope of employment, acts done with criminal intent, acts done in bad faith or with malicious purpose or acts that violate state or federal law. (3)  The local school board or public charter school governing board may reimburse or compensate a teacher or other school employee for reasonable attorney's fees and court costs incurred in defending a claim arising from the employee's good-faith performance under Sections 37-11-89 through 37-11-103. (4)  Nothing in this section creates a private right of action against a school district, public charter school, local school board or governing board for damages. SECTION 8.  The following shall be codified as Section 37-11-94, Mississippi Code of 1972: 37-11-103.  (1)  By July 1, 2026, each local school board and each public charter school governing board shall adopt or revise policies and procedures necessary to implement Sections 37-11-89 through 37-11-103.  Such policies must be incorporated into the code of student conduct required under Section 37-11-55. (2)  Each school district and public charter school shall provide annual training to teachers and administrators regarding:  (a) development and approval of classroom management plans; (b) removal and administrative placement procedures; (c) required documentation and parent notice; (d) readmission conferences and behavioral support plans; (e) appeal and nonretaliation procedures; and (f) discipline requirements applicable to students with disabilities under federal law. (3)  Each school district and public charter school shall maintain records of removals and resulting disciplinary actions and shall report aggregate data annually to the Mississippi Department of Education in a manner prescribed by the department. SECTION 9.  Section 37-3-85, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 37-3-85.  (1)  The Legislature finds that: (a)  Students who are serious behavior problems in school are at risk of becoming juvenile and adult offenders; (b)  Growing numbers of children live in conditions that place them at risk of school failure; (c)  The provision of school and support services to these children and their families by public and nonprofit agencies is fragmented and does not prepare these children to learn effectively and have a successful school experience; (d)  The lack of collaboration among schools, families, local agencies and other groups involved in family support and youth development activities results in the inefficient and ineffective use of resources to meet the needs of these children; (e)  Schools are dedicating an increasing amount of their time and resources to responding to disruptive and violent behavior rather than fulfilling their mission to challenge with high expectations each child to learn, to achieve and to fulfill his or her potential; (f)  Responding to the needs of students who are at risk of school failure and providing for a safe and secure learning environment are cost-effective because it enables the state to substitute preventive measures for expensive crisis intervention; and (g)  Differing local needs and local resources necessitate the development of locally generated, community-based plans that coordinate and leverage existing resources, not the imposition of uniform and inflexible, state-mandated plans. (2)  There is established within the State Department of Education the Support Our Students (S.O.S.) program.  The purpose of the program is to award grants to neighborhood- and community-based organizations to establish local S.O.S. programs that provide high quality after-school mentoring activities for school-aged children and provide for comprehensive, collaborative delivery of mentoring services by public and nonpublic agencies to these children.  These services shall be designed to enrich and make a positive impact on the lives of school-aged children.  These after-school activities may include activities after the regular school day and activities on days that students are not required to attend school. (3)  The goals of the S.O.S. program are to: (a)  Reduce juvenile crime in local communities served by the program; (b)  Recruit community volunteers to provide positive adult role models for school-aged children and to help supervise after-school activities; (c)  Reduce the number of students who are unsupervised after school, otherwise known as "latchkey" children; (d)  Improve the academic performance of students participating in the program; (e)  Meet the physical, intellectual, emotional and social needs of students participating in the program and improve their attitudes and behavior; * * *and (f)  Improve coordination of existing resources and enhance collaboration so as to provide services to school-aged children effectively and efficiently * * *.; and (g)  Reduce the occurrence and reoccurrence of incidences of misconduct, outbursts and unruly, abusive or disruptive behavior by students in the classroom setting. (4)  As used in this section, "school-aged children" means children enrolled in kindergarten through the ninth grade. (5)  The State Department of Education shall develop and implement the Support Our Students (S.O.S.) program.  The department shall: (a)  Sponsor a statewide conference each year for teams of interested representatives to provide background information and assistance regarding all aspects of the program; (b)  Disseminate information regarding the program to interested neighborhood and community groups; (c)  Develop and disseminate a request for applications to establish local S.O.S. programs; (d)  Provide initial technical assistance to grant applicants and ongoing technical assistance as grants are implemented; (e)  Administer funds appropriated by the Legislature; (f)  Monitor the grants funded; (g)  Revoke a grant if necessary or appropriate; (h)  Develop and implement a performance-based evaluation system to evaluate the program; (i)  Report on the program implementation to the Legislature and the Office of the Governor; (j)  Adopt any rules necessary to implement this section. (6)  A community- or neighborhood-based 501(c)(3) entity or a consortium consisting of one or more local 501(c)(3) entities and one or more local school districts may apply for a grant. (7)  Applicants for grants shall submit to the State Department of Education an application that includes the following information: (a)  Identification of one or more neighborhoods to be served by the local S.O.S. program, based on a needs assessment of existing conditions for school-aged children to be served. Data used in the needs assessment may include for each neighborhood to be served by a local program (i) dropout statistics, (ii) the number and percentage of school-aged children who participate in the federal subsidized lunch program, (iii) the number of suspensions and expulsions involving school-aged children, (iv) the number of children to be served, (v) the number and percentage of students with two (2) working parents or one (1) single parent to be served at a site; (vi) the incidence of juvenile crime in the neighborhood, and (vii) any other relevant or unique local demographic data. Local authorities shall provide this or related information on a timely basis to local 501(c)(3) entities submitting applications to establish local S.O.S. programs; (b)  A three-year plan that addresses data used in the needs assessment and that includes proposed goals and anticipated outcomes of the local S.O.S. program.  The plan shall be prepared after consultation with local after-school programs, schools, community organizations or groups which have as their purpose assisting or helping school-aged children who are at risk of failing in school or entering the juvenile justice system, or other appropriate groups.  In addition, the three-year plan shall provide for regular collaborative efforts to seek input and advice from parents of the students being served and from other citizens who reflect the demographic conditions of the students being served; (c)  A statement of how grant funds would be used to address local problems and what other resources would be used to address the problems.  This statement should include a list of services to be offered that are related to the goals and outcomes and should include plans for recruiting volunteers to assist in the program's activities; and (d)  A process for assessing on an annual basis the success of the local plan for addressing the goals of the local S.O.S. program. (8)  The department shall develop and disseminate a request for applications and establish procedures to be followed in developing and submitting applications to establish local S.O.S. programs and administering grants to establish local S.O.S. programs. In reviewing grant applications, the State Superintendent of Education shall consider the prevalence of under-served students and families in low-income neighborhoods and in isolated rural areas in the area for which the grant is requested, the severity of the local problems with regard to children at risk of school failure and with regard to school discipline, whether the proposed program meets state standards, and the likelihood that the locally designed plan will deal with the problems successfully.  During the review process, the superintendent may recommend modifications in grant applications to applicants.  The superintendent shall submit recommendations to the State Board of Education on which applicants should receive grants and the amount they should receive. In selecting grant recipients, the State Board of Education shall consider (a) the recommendations of the superintendent, (b) the geographic location of the applicants, and (c) the demographic profile of the applicants.  After considering these factors, the State Board of Education shall give priority to grant applications that will serve areas that have a high incidence of juvenile crime and that propose different approaches that can serve as models for other communities.  The State Board of Education shall select the grant recipients prior to July 1, 1995, for local programs that will be in operation at the beginning of the 1995-1996 school year, and prior to July 1 and thereafter for the appropriate school year. A grant recipient may request a modification of a grant or additional funds to implement a grant through the grant application process.  The request shall be reviewed and accepted or rejected in the same manner as a grant application. (9)  The State Department of Education shall administer the grant program under the direction of the State Board of Education.  The State Department of Education shall provide technical assistance to grant applicants and recipients. (10)  All agencies of the state and local government, including departments of human services, health departments, local mental health, and intellectual disability commissions, court personnel, law enforcement agencies and cities and counties shall cooperate with the State Department of Education and local school boards that receive grants in coordinating the S.O.S. program at the state level and in implementing the S.O.S. program at the local level. (11)  The Department of Education shall develop and implement an evaluation system, under the direction of the State Board of Education, that will assess the efficiency and effectiveness of the S.O.S. program.  However, private schools shall not be included under the provisions of this section. SECTION 10.  Section 37-9-71, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 37-9-71.  (1)  The superintendent of schools and the principal of a school shall have the power to suspend or expel a pupil for good cause, including misconduct in the school or on school property, as defined in Section 37-11-29, on the road to and from school, or at any school-related activity or event when such conduct by a pupil, in the determination of the superintendent or principal, renders that pupil's presence in the classroom a disruption to the educational environment of the school or a detriment to the best interest and welfare of the pupils and teacher of such class as a whole, or for any reason for which such pupil might be suspended, dismissed or expelled by the school board under state or federal law or any rule, regulation or policy of the local school district.  For any suspension of more than ten (10) days or expulsions, a student shall have the right to a due process hearing, be represented by legal counsel, to present evidence and cross-examine witnesses presented by the district.  The student and the student's parent, legal guardian or person in custody of the student may appeal suspension of more than ten (10) days and expulsions to the school board.  The standard of proof in all disciplinary proceedings shall be substantial evidence.  The parent or guardian of the child shall be advised of this right to a hearing by the appropriate superintendent or principal and the proper form shall be provided for requesting such a hearing. (2)  Nothing in this section shall be construed to limit a teacher's authority to remove a student from the classroom under Sections 37-11-89 through 37-11-103, nor to require that a removal under those sections be treated as a suspension or expulsion. SECTION 11.  Section 37-11-1, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 37-11-1.  (1)  Subject to the provisions of subsection (2) of this section, after a pupil has been assigned to a particular public school in a school district, the principal, or anyone else vested with the authority of assigning pupils to classes, knowingly shall not place such pupil in a class where the pupil's presence would serve to adversely affect, hinder, * * *or retard substantially delay the progress of the academic development of the other pupils in the class. (2)  (a)  A parent or guardian of twins or higher order multiples, as defined in paragraph (d) of this subsection, may request that the children be placed in the same classroom or in separate classrooms if the children are in the same grade level at the same school in the school district.  The school may recommend classroom placement and provide professional education advice to the parent or guardian to assist the parent or guardian in making the best decision for the children's education.  A school must provide the placement requested by the children's parent or guardian unless:  (i) the parent or guardian has requested that the children, who are different sexes, be placed in the same classroom and the students in the school have been assigned to different classrooms according to sex, as authorized under Section 37-11-3; or (ii) the school board of the school district makes a classroom placement determination following the school principal's request according to this subsection. (b)  A parent or guardian making a request under this subsection must submit a written request for the classroom placement to the school principal no later than fourteen (14) calendar days after the first day of each school year or, if the children are enrolled in the school after the school year commences, no later than fourteen (14) calendar days after the children's first day of attendance in the school. (c)  At the end of the initial grading period during which children have been in the same classroom or separate classrooms pursuant to their parent or guardian's request under this subsection, if the principal, in consultation with the children's classroom teacher or teachers, determines that the requested classroom placement is disruptive to the school, the principal may request that the school board determine the children's classroom placement. (d)  For purposes of this section, the term "higher order multiples" means triplets, quadruplets, quintuplets or more. SECTION 12.  Section 37-11-18.1, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 37-11-18.1.  (1)  For the purposes of this section: (a)  The term "disruptive behavior" means conduct of a student that is so unruly, disruptive or abusive that it seriously interferes with a schoolteacher's or school administrator's ability to communicate with the students in a classroom, with a student's ability to learn, or with the operation of a school or school-related activity, and which is not covered by other laws related to violence or possession of weapons or controlled substances on school property, school vehicles or at school-related activities.  Such behaviors include, but are not limited to:  foul, profane, obscene, threatening, defiant or abusive language or action toward teachers or other school employees; defiance, ridicule or verbal attack of a teacher; and willful, deliberate and overt acts of disobedience of the directions of a teacher; and (b)  The term "habitually disruptive" refers to such actions of a student which cause disruption in a classroom, on school property or vehicles or at a school-related activity on more than two (2) occasions during a school year, and to disruptive behavior that was initiated, willful and overt on the part of the student and which required the attention of school personnel to deal with the disruption. However, no student shall be considered to be habitually disruptive before the development of a behavior modification plan for the student in accordance with the code of student conduct and discipline plans of the school district. (2)  Every behavior modification plan written pursuant to this section must be developed by utilizing evidence-based practices and positive behavioral intervention supports.  The plan must be implemented no later than two (2) weeks after the occurrence of the disruptive behavior. (3)  Any student who is thirteen (13) years of age or older for whom a behavior modification plan is developed by the school principal, reporting teacher and student's parent and which student does not comply with the plan shall be deemed habitually disruptive and subject to expulsion on the occurrence of the third act of disruptive behavior during a school year.  After the second act of disruptive behavior during a school year by a student, the parents or legal guardian of the student shall be provided written notice of the potential consequential outcomes for such behavior, and a psychological evaluation shall be performed upon the child. SECTION 13.  Section 37-11-55, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 37-11-55.  The local school board shall adopt and make available to all teachers, school personnel, students and parents or guardians, at the beginning of each school year, a code of student conduct developed in consultation with teachers, school personnel, students and parents or guardians.  The code shall be based on the rules governing student conduct and discipline adopted by the school board and shall be made available at the school level in the student handbook or similar publication.  The code shall include, but not be limited to: (a)  Specific grounds for disciplinary action under the school district's discipline plan; (b)  Procedures to be followed for acts requiring discipline, including suspensions and expulsion, which comply with due process requirements; (c)  An explanation of the responsibilities and rights of students with regard to:  attendance; respect for persons and property; knowledge and observation of rules of conduct; free speech and student publications; assembly; privacy; and participation in school programs and activities; (d)  Policies and procedures recognizing the teacher as the authority in classroom matters, and supporting that teacher in any decision in compliance with the written discipline code of conduct.  Such recognition shall include the right of the teacher to remove from the classroom any student who, in the professional judgment of the teacher, is disrupting the learning environment, to the office of the principal or assistant principal.  The removal authority shall be exercised and implemented in accordance with Sections 37-11-89 through 37-11-103 and the teacher's approved classroom management plan.  The principal or assistant principal shall determine the proper placement for the student * * *, who may not be returned to the classroom until a conference of some kind has been held with the parent, guardian or custodian during which the disrupting behavior is discussed and agreements are reached that no further disruption will be tolerated.  If the principal does not approve of the determination of the teacher to remove the student from the classroom, the student may not be removed from the classroom, and the principal, upon request from the teacher, must provide justification for his disapproval.  A student removed by the teacher may not be returned to the classroom until the readmission requirements of Section 37-11-97 are satisfied.  If the principal believes a removal was not consistent with the code of student conduct, the principal may initiate the appeal process adopted under Section 37-11-99, but the student shall remain in administrative placement pending compliance with Section 37-11-97 unless the teacher consents; (e)  Policies and procedures for dealing with a student who causes a disruption in the classroom, on school property or vehicles, or at school-related activities, including procedures for teacher-directed removal, administrative placement and readmission under Sections 37-11-89 through 37-11-103; (f)  Procedures for the development of behavior modification plans by the school principal, reporting teacher and student's parent for a student who causes a disruption in the classroom, on school property or vehicles, or at school-related activities for a second time during the school year, which shall include the behavioral support plan required by Section 37-11-97(5) when applicable; and (g)  Policies and procedures specifically concerning gang-related activities in the school, on school property or vehicles, or at school-related activities. SECTION 14.  Section 37-11-57, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 37-11-57.  (1)  Except in the case of excessive force or cruel and unusual punishment, a public school teacher, assistant teacher, principal, or an assistant principal acting within the course and scope of his employment shall not be liable for any action carried out in conformity with state or federal law or rules or regulations of the State Board of Education or the local school board or governing board of a charter school regarding the control, discipline, suspension and expulsion of students, including actions taken pursuant to Sections 37-11-89 through 37-11-103. The local school board shall provide any necessary legal defense to a teacher, assistant teacher, principal, or assistant principal in the school district who was acting within the course and scope of his employment in any action which may be filed against such school personnel.  A school district or charter school, as the case may be, shall be entitled to reimbursement for legal fees and expenses from its employee if a court finds that the act of the employee was outside the course and scope of his employment, or that the employee was acting with criminal intent.  Any action by a school district or charter school against its employee and any action by the employee against the school district or charter school for necessary legal fees and expenses shall be tried to the court in the same suit brought against the school employee. (2)  Corporal punishment administered in a reasonable manner, or any reasonable action to maintain control and discipline of students taken by a public school teacher, assistant teacher, principal or assistant principal acting within the scope of his employment or function and in accordance with any state or federal laws or rules or regulations of the State Board of Education or the local school board or governing board of a charter school does not constitute negligence or child abuse.  No public school teacher, assistant teacher, principal or assistant principal so acting shall be held liable in a suit for civil damages alleged to have been suffered by a student as a result of the administration of corporal punishment, or the taking of action to maintain control and discipline of a student, unless the court determines that the teacher, assistant teacher, principal or assistant principal acted in bad faith or with malicious purpose or in a manner exhibiting a wanton and willful disregard of human rights or safety. For the purposes of this subsection, "corporal punishment" means the reasonable use of physical force or physical contact by a teacher, assistant teacher, principal or assistant principal, as may be necessary to maintain discipline, to enforce a school rule, for self-protection or for the protection of other students from disruptive students. (3)  Notwithstanding subsection (2) of this section a public school teacher, assistant teacher, principal, assistant principal or other school personnel is prohibited from using corporal punishment, as defined in subsection (2) of this section, on any student with a disability.  No school personnel shall be granted immunity from liability under subsection (2) of this section for the use of corporal punishment on a student with a disability.  For purposes of this subsection, the term "student with a disability" means a student who has an individualized education plan (IEP) under the Individuals with Disabilities Education Act (IDEA) or a Section 504 plan under the Rehabilitation Act of 1973.  The term "school personnel" includes all individuals employed on a full-time or part-time basis by a public school. SECTION 15.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.